Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3068.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 181.03, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Wages to employees of staffing services. new text end new text begin A staffing service must pay wages to an employee of the staffing service, regardless of whether an assignment is ultimately completed for a shift or day, if the employee has reasonably relied on placement at an assignment by the staffing service for the shift or day and the staffing service canceled the assignment. For purposes of this subdivision, "staffing service" has the meaning given in section 268.035, subdivision 21d. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end